en: Papier Mache Shapes
xx: Papier Mache Shapes
cs: Tvary z papier maché
da: Forme af papmaché
de: Pappmaschee-Formen
es: Formas de papel maché
fr: Formes en papier mâché
it: Forme per cartapesta
ja: 張り子の型
nl: Vormen van papier-maché
no: Pappmasjéformer
pl: Kształty z masy papierowej
pt: Fôrmas para papel machê
ru: Формы из папье-маше
sv: Papier-maché-formar
tr: Kağıt Hamuru Modelleri

en: Wreath & Floral Frames
xx: Wreath & Floral Frames
cs: Základy na výrobu věnců a floristiku
da: Kranse og rammer til blomsterdekorationer
de: Kranz- & Gesteckunterlagen
es: Marcos y coronas florales
fr: Couronnes et cadres floraux
it: Cornici floreali e ghirlande
ja: 花輪・花枠
nl: Kransen en bloemendragers
no: Kranser og blomsterrammer
pl: Wieńce i ramki z kwiatów
pt: Quadros florais e guirlandas
ru: Каркасы в виде венков и рамки с цветочным узором
sv: Ramar för krans- och blomarrangemang
tr: Çelenk ve Çiçek Çerçeveleri

en: Crafting Adhesives & Magnets
xx: Crafting Adhesives & Magnets
cs: Hobby magnety a lepení
da: Klæbemidler og magneter til håndarbejde
de: Bastelklebstoffe & -magnete
es: Imanes y pegatinas para manualidades
fr: Adhésifs et aimants pour loisirs créatifs
it: Magneti e adesivi per attività creative
ja: クラフト用接着剤・磁石
nl: Hechtmiddelen en magneten voor hobbygebruik
no: Lim og magneter til håndverk
pl: Kleje i magnesy dla rękodzieła
pt: Adesivos e imâs para artesanato
ru: Склеивающие вещества и магниты
sv: Hobbyklister/lim och -magneter
tr: El İşi Yapışkanları ve Mıknatısları

en: Craft & Office Glue
xx: Craft & Office Glue
cs: Lepidla pro hobby a kancelář
da: Papirlim
de: Bastel- & Büroklebstoff
es: Pegamento de oficina y para manualidades
fr: Colle de bureau et colle pour loisirs créatifs
it: Colla da ufficio e per attività creative
ja: クラフト用のり・オフィス用のり
nl: Lijm voor hobby- en kantoorgebruik
no: Håndverkslim og kontorlim
pl: Kleje dla hobbystów i do biura
pt: Colas para artesanato e para escritório
ru: Канцелярский клей и клей для рукодельных работ
sv: Hobby- och kontorslim
tr: El İşi ve Ofis Yapıştırıcısı

en: Craft Magnets
xx: Craft Magnets
cs: Magnety
da: Håndarbejde – magneter
de: Bastelmagnete
es: Imanes artesanales
fr: Aimants pour loisirs créatifs
it: Magneti per lavoretti
ja: 磁石・マグネット
nl: Knutselmagneetjes
no: Håndverksmagneter
pl: Magnesy ozdobne
pt: Ímãs artesanais
ru: Фигурные магниты
sv: Hantverksmagneter
tr: El İşi Mıknatısları

en: Decorative Tape
xx: Decorative Tape
cs: Ozdobné pásky
da: Dekorationstape
de: Deko-Klebeband
es: Cinta decorativa
fr: Ruban adhésif décoratif
it: Nastro decorativo
ja: 装飾テープ
nl: Decoratief plakband
no: Dekorativ tape
pl: Taśmy dekoracyjne
pt: Fitas decorativas
ru: Декоративная клейкая лента
sv: Dekorationstejp
tr: Dekoratif Bant

en: Floral Tape
xx: Floral Tape
cs: Aranžérské pásky
da: Blomstertape
de: Blumenklebeband
es: Cinta floral
fr: Ruban adhésif floral
it: Nastro da fiorista
ja: フローラテープ
nl: Bloementape
no: Blomsterteip
pl: Taśmy florystyczne
pt: Fita para amarrar flores
ru: Лента для цветов
sv: Floristtejp
tr: Çiçek Bandı

en: Fusible Tape
xx: Fusible Tape
cs: Textilní nažehlovací pásky
da: Stof – tape
de: Aufbügelbänder
es: Cinta de tela fundible
fr: Ruban thermocollant
it: Nastro adesivo a caldo per tessuto
ja: 布用接着テープ
nl: Opstrijkbare stofband
no: Stofftape
pl: Taśmy termoprzylepne do tkanin
pt: Fita de tecido adesiva
ru: Плавкая тканевая лента
sv: Tygtejp
tr: Yapışkanlı Kumaş Bantları

en: Crafting Fibers
xx: Crafting Fibers
cs: Hobby textilní vlákna
da: Fibre til håndarbejde
de: Bastelwerkstoffe
es: Fibras para manualidades
fr: Fibres pour loisirs créatifs
it: Fibre per attività creative
ja: クラフト用糸
nl: Handwerkvezels
no: Håndverksstoff
pl: Włókna do rękodzieła
pt: Fibras para artesanato
ru: Нитки для рукоделия
sv: Hobbyvadd
tr: El İşi İpleri

en: Jewelry & Beading Cord
xx: Jewelry & Beading Cord
cs: Šňůry na šperky a korálky
da: Smykke- og perlesnore
de: Schmuck- & Perlenband
es: Cordones para joyería y cuentas
fr: Cordons pour bijoux et perles
it: Fili per perline e gioielli
ja: ジュエリー・ビーズ用コード
nl: Sieraden- en kralenkoorden
no: Smykke- og perletråd
pl: Nici do koralików i biżuterii
pt: Cordões para joias e bijuterias
ru: Ювелирные цепи
sv: Smyckes- och pärlsnöre
tr: Mücevher ve Tespih İpleri

en: Thread & Floss
xx: Thread & Floss
cs: Nitě
da: Tråd
de: Zwirn
es: Hilos para bordar
fr: Fil
it: Filo
ja: 糸
nl: Draad
no: Tråd
pl: Nici
pt: LInhas
ru: Нитки
sv: Tråd
tr: İplikler

en: Unspun Fiber
xx: Unspun Fiber
cs: Česané rouno
da: Uspundet fiber
de: Rohwolle
es: Fibra sin hilar
fr: Fibre non filée
it: Fibra non filata
ja: 糸紡ぎ用繊維
nl: Ongesponnen vezel
no: Uspunnet fiber
pl: Włókna nieprzędzione
pt: Fibra não fiada
ru: Нетканое волокно
sv: Ospunnet fiber
tr: Eğirilmemiş Elyaf

en: Yarn
xx: Yarn
cs: Příze
da: Garn
de: Garne
es: Lanas
fr: Fil à tricoter
it: Filati
ja: 毛糸
nl: Draadgaren
no: Garn
pl: Przędza
pt: Fio têxtil
ru: Пряжа
sv: Garn
tr: Yün İplikleri

en: Crafting Wire
xx: Crafting Wire
cs: Hobby drát
da: Metaltråd til håndarbejde
de: Basteldraht
es: Alambre para manualidades
fr: Fil pour loisirs créatifs
it: Filo per attività creative
ja: クラフト用ワイヤー
nl: Handwerkdraad
no: Ståltråd til håndverk
pl: Drut do rękodzieła
pt: Fios para artesanato
ru: Проволока для рукоделия
sv: Hobbyståltråd
tr: El İşi Teli

en: Craft Pipe Cleaners
xx: Craft Pipe Cleaners
cs: Čističe dýmek
da: Håndarbejde – piberensere
de: Pfeifenreiniger
es: Limpiapipas
fr: Fils chenille
it: Scovolini per attività decorative
ja: 手芸用カラーモール
nl: Pijpenragers voor handwerken
no: Piperensere
pl: Kolorowe wyciory do fajki
pt: Limpadores de cachimbo artesanais
ru: Ёршики для чистки трубок
sv: Piprensare
tr: El İşi Kadife Saçakları

en: Floral Wire
xx: Floral Wire
cs: Floristický drát
da: Metaltråd til blomsterdekorationer
de: Blumendraht
es: Alambre de floristería
fr: Fil à lier les fleurs
it: Filo per fiorista
ja: 花用ワイヤー
nl: Bloemschikdraad
no: Blomstertråd
pl: Drut florystyczny
pt: Fios florais
ru: Проволока для создания цветочных композиций
sv: Blomtråd
tr: Çiçek Teli

en: Jewelry & Beading Wire
xx: Jewelry & Beading Wire
cs: Dráty na šperky a korálky
da: Smykke- og perletråd
de: Schmuck- & Perlendraht
es: alambre para joyería y bisutería
fr: Fil pour bijoux
it: Filo per perle
ja: ジュエリー・ビーズ用ワイヤー
nl: Sieraden- en kralendraden
no: Smykke- og perlemetalltråd
pl: Druty do koralików i biżuterii
pt: Fio para bijuteria
ru: Ювелирная проволока
sv: Smyckes- och pärlwire
tr: Mücevher ve Tespih Telleri

en: Embellishments & Trims
xx: Embellishments & Trims
cs: Ozdoby a lemy
da: Dekorationer og udsmykninger
de: Verzierungen & Trimmungen
es: Recortes y adornos
fr: Décorations et ornements
it: Decorazioni e ornamenti
ja: 装飾用品
nl: Ornamenten en versiering
no: Utsmykning
pl: Ozdoby i wykończenia
pt: Enfeites e ornamentos
ru: Украшения и декоративные элементы
sv: Utsmyckning och dekorationer
tr: Süslemeler

en: Appliques & Patches
xx: Appliques & Patches
cs: Látkové záplaty
da: Stofmønstre
de: Textilaufnäher & -aufbügler
es: Parches de tela y apliques
fr: Applications et patches à coudre
it: Toppe in tessuto
ja: パッチワーク用生地
nl: Lapjes stof
no: Applikasjonsbroderier og stofflapper
pl: Łatki z tkaniny
pt: Remendos e apliques
ru: Тканевые заплатки
sv: Tyglappar
tr: Aplikler ve Yamalar

en: Beads
xx: Beads
cs: Korálky
da: Perler
de: Perlen
es: Cuentas y abalorios
fr: Perles
it: Perline
ja: ビーズ
nl: Kralen
no: Perler
pl: Koraliki
pt: Contas
ru: Бисер
sv: Pärlor
tr: Tespihler